Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2147.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 505.4(a) of the act of April 12, 1951 (P.L.90, No.21), known as the Liquor Code, is amended to read:Section 505.4. Limited Distilleries and Distilleries.--(a) The board may issue a distillery of historical significance license to any distillery which was established prior to January 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526 1, [1875] 1885. The holder of the license may manufacture and sell liquor produced on the licensed premises to the board, to entities licensed by the board and to the public under such conditions and regulations as the board may enforce. [Production at the distillery of historical significance shall be limited to an amount not to exceed twenty thousand (20,000) gallons per year.] The distillery does not need to establish continuous operation since January 1, [1875] 1885, in order to qualify for a license under this section. The following shall apply:(1) The board may issue to the holder of a distillery license a distillery of historical significance license in exchange for the distillery license so long as the applicant meets the date of establishment requirement. The board may not charge a fee for this exchange. An applicant under this subsection shall surrender the applicant's distillery license for cancellation prior to the issuance of the new distillery of historical significance license.(2) A holder of a distillery of historical significance license shall be permitted the same rights as governed under a distillery license.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2147PN2773 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122